Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201760-1302
Eminent domain; procedure.

The Department of Transportation is hereby authorized to take, hold, and acquire by eminent domain so much real estate as may be necessary and convenient to carry out the provisions of section 60-1301. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1949, c. 109, § 2, p. 300;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 88, p. 485;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-603.04;

Laws 1955, c. 145, § 2, p. 406;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 234.